Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.140

Implementation of statewide certification.

Implementation of statewide certification shall be effective January 1, 1988, following consultation by the office with appropriate state and local officials who currently administer similar certification programs. Any business having been certified under any of the programs identified pursuant to *RCW 39.19.130 as a minority and women's business enterprise shall be deemed certified by the office as of January 1, 1988.

[ 1987 c 328 s 9.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 39.19.130 expired June 30, 1991.